Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; INDUSTRY RESEARCH.new text end new text begin $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to advance innovation and new technologies in the biomanufacturing, precision agriculture, hypersonics, and green energy and green iron industries. new text end